morphology/spellcheckUnificado_foma_new/spanishSpellcheck.foma
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-
 
# recognizes quechua words with spanish roots, (almost) no relaxation on orthography, only accents

       #derivation boundary
       define DB [[ "[" "^DB" "]"] :0];

      #Morpheme-Boundary
       define MB [[ "[""--""]"] :0];

       #-------------------------------#
       # Delete all flag on both sides #
       #-------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1 [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@MPA"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@PLYUQ"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@MPA"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"] ];

############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Numbers [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%,|%.|%'];
      define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ü|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"];
      
      define VowelRoot [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ü];
      define ConsRoot [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z|'];

      #--------------------------#
      # allow uppercase letters  #
      #--------------------------#

      define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ];


      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # Ersetze optional u durch o und i durch e, falls in Umgebung von q #
      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define Allophone [ u (->) o||  _  (s|t|n|r|l|"@KU"|"@PU"|"@MU"|"@RQU") q, q (s|t|n|r|h|l|') _  , _ (s|t|n|r|l|"@KU"|"@PU"|"@MU"|"@RQU"){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|h|l|') _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|"@PTI"|"@CHI"|"@YSI") q, q (s|t|n|r|l|ll|h|') _ , _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|"@PTI"|"@CHI"|"@YSI"){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|l|ll|') _  ];

       #---------------------------#
       # alternative orthographies #
       #---------------------------#

       define Orthography1 [ {q} (->) {cc}, {Q} (->) {Cc}];
       define Orthography2 [ {wi} (->) {hui}, {Wi} (->) {Hui}  ];
       define Orthography3 [ {wa} (->) {hua}, {Wa} (->) {Hua} ];
       define Orthography4 [ {wa} (->) {gua}, {Wa} (->) {Gua}];
       define Orthography5 [ {w} (->) {u} || {a}_ ];
       define Orthography6 [ {h} (->) {j}, {H} (->) {J} ];
       define Orthography7 [ {k} (->) {j} || Vowel_];
       define Orthography8 [ {ch} (->) {ts}, {Ch} (->) {Ts} ];
       define Orthography9 [ {ph} (->) {f}];
       define Orthography10 [ {w} (->) {u} || Vowel _ ];
       define Orthography11 [ {q} (->) {j} || Vowel_];
       
       define Orthography [Orthography1 .o. Orthography2 .o. Orthography3 .o. Orthography4 .o. Orthography5 .o.  Orthography6 .o. Orthography7 .o. Orthography8 .o. Orthography9 .o. Orthography10 .o. Orthography11 ];


       define QuechuaOrtho Allophone .o. Orthography;

       # apply after Cleanup
       define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||  _ [w|y] .#.];
       define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
       define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
       
        #-------------------------------------------------#
       # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
       #                                                 #
       #- may be written with or without their accents   #
       #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) e,í (->) i, ó (->) o,ú (->) u, ü (->) u];
      # define spanLetras1 [ e (->) i, o (->) u || .#. ~$[e|o] _ ~$[e|o] .#. ];
      # define spanLetras2 [  c (->) k , v (->) w ];
       define SpanOrtho AccentES;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES                             ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #-----------------------------------------------------#
      # Possessive -nkuna -> ambiguous: -n-kuna or nku-kuna #
      #-----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 3PossPl  [ {nku} %["NPers"%] %["+3.Pl.Poss"%] (<-) n %["NPers"%] %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 3PossPl  [  %["+3.Poss"%] <-  %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       #----------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive -ykuna -> ambiguous: y-kuna or yku-kuna #
       #----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 1PossPl [ {yku} %["NPers"%] %["+1.Pl.Excl.Poss"%] (<-) y %["NPers"%] %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 1PossPl [  %["+1.Poss"%] <-  %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       define PossessivPlural [3PossPl .o. 1PossPl];

       #------------------------------------------------------------#
       # Genitive -pa after Konsonant, -q/-p after Vowel (optional) #
       #------------------------------------------------------------#
      # define GENITIV [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowel  _ ];
	define PA1 [  {q}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define PA2 [  {p}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	#define PA3 [  {pa}"@PA" => Cons _  ];
      define GENITIV PA1 .o. PA2 ;

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive forms need euphon. -ni/-ñi after Consonants #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#

       # define POSSESSIV1 [ "@POSS" -> {ni}  || Cons _ ];
       # define POSSESSIV2 [ "@POSS" ->  "" || [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú] _ ];
       # define POSSESSIV POSSESSIV1 .o. POSSESSIV2;

	define POSS1 [ "@POSS"  => [Vowel & ~$[{ni}]] _  ];
	define POSS2 [ "@POSSni" => Cons _  ];
	define POSSESSIV POSS1 .o. POSS2;

       define NounRules GENITIV .o. POSSESSIV;

       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # CONTEXT RESTRICTIONS:                                  #
       # na as +Rzpr has be followed by ku, chi or spa          #
       # mu shortened to 'n' is only allowed preceding pu       #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"] ];
       define shortYKU [  "+y+"  => _ %["VDeriv"%] %["+Aff"%] "@YKU" %["^DB"%] %["--"%]{wa}%["VPers"%] ];
       
       # transitive forms
       define watrans [  "@WA"  => "+1.Obj" ?* _  ];
       define sutrans [  "@SU"  => "+2.Obj" ?* _  ];

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # if in lower side {rqu} as {rqa}, {pu} as {pa} etc. -> we want those forms to appear on the upper side as well               #
       # (otherwise rqa/pa would appear as rqu/pu in the output, which would be wrong given the morphological context of these forms #
       # for normalizer: rewrite ru as rqu and ra as rqa, respectivly (TODO: as well yu/yku, ya/yka?                                 #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define rqurqa5 [ {rqa}"+rqu+" <- {rqu}"+rqu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa6 [ {rqu}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa7 [ {rqa}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       
       define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka4 [ {yku}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka5 [ {yka}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       define mpuDIR2 [ {m}"+mu+" <- {mu}"+mu+"  \\  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       define pupa2 [ {pa}"+pu+" <- {pu}"+pu+" \\  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];
       define kuka2 [ {ka}"+ku+" <- {ku}"+ku+" \\  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

      define VerbRulesUpper  naRzpr .o. shortYKU .o. rqurqa5 .o. rqurqa6 .o. rqurqa7 .o. ykuyka3 .o. ykuyka4 .o. ykuyka5 .o. mpuDIR2  .o. pupa2 .o. kuka2 .o. watrans .o. sutrans;

       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # rqu --> rqa before mu, pu , ri ,ysi (rqa can only be +Rptn in this position, everywhere   #
       # else, it's supposed to be NPst                                                            #
       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU" (->) {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* "@KU"];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* "@KU"];      

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -yku becomes -yka before -mu, -pu, -ysi, -chi, -ri, -cha                             #
       # and -na. Seems not always to be the case, therefore, this rule is optional (->)      #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" (->) {yka}"@YKU" || _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YKU" (->) {ya}"@YKU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -mu translocative --> as -m only before pu (might otherwise be confused wth -mpa, positional, -mpu can be written as npu #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> [m|n]"@MU"  ||  _ ?* "@PU" ];
